Tennessee statutes. Title 64 Regional Authorities
Part 9

West Fork Drakes Creek Dam and Reservoir Interstate Authority

64-1-901. Creation — Purpose.

The West Fork Drakes Creek dam and reservoir interstate authority is hereby created. The West Fork Drakes Creek dam and reservoir interstate authority shall be a public body corporate and politic and shall be referred to as the “authority” in this part. The authority shall develop the resources of the region embracing the Tennessee county of Sumner and the Kentucky county of Simpson by means of the construction and maintenance of the dam across the West Fork Drakes Creek and the reservoir created by this dam. The water impounded within this reservoir shall be utilized by the areas encompassing the authority to provide a source of water for both recreation and economic development to be used in industrial, commercial, agricultural and residential activities. The authority may develop this dam and reservoir for these stated purposes.

The general assembly hereby finds that the need for the purposes for which this authority is created is evidenced by the effects that the recent droughts have had and continue to have on this area. The general assembly also finds that an adequate supply of potable water is essential for the continued growth of this area.

Acts 1991, ch. 308, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 9, §§64-1-901 —64-1-909 (Acts 1989, ch. 382, § 1; 1990, ch. 1027, § 11), concerning the West Fork Drakes Creek dam and reservoir interstate authority, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 308, § 1, effective May 14, 1991.

The West Fork Drakes Creek dam and reservoir interstate authority, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

64-1-902. Board of directors.

The authority shall be governed by a board of directors. The board shall make policy, which shall be implemented.

The membership of the board shall be as follows:

A member of the county legislative body of Sumner County, Tennessee and Simpson County, Kentucky, chosen by their respective legislative bodies;

The mayors of the cities of Portland, Tennessee and Franklin, Kentucky;

A member of the city legislative bodies from the cities of Portland, Tennessee and Franklin, Kentucky chosen by the respective legislative bodies;

A member of an industrial foundation board or equivalent, if one exists, from Portland, Tennessee and Franklin, Kentucky, as appointed by the respective boards;

A commissioner or designee chosen by the board of commissioners of the Simpson County water district; and

A commissioner or designee chosen by the board of commissioners of the Sumner County water authority.

Each local governmental entity that is authorized to designate one (1) of its members for membership on the board shall designate the member by an appropriate resolution or ordinance.

Each participating governmental entity shall adopt an appropriate resolution or ordinance, which shall state the intention of the local entity to participate in the authority. The resolution or ordinance shall also include a recitation of the participating entity's statutory authority for participation.

The authority shall not convene or conduct business until the requirements of this subsection (c) have been met.

Any elected official's or such elected official's designated alternate's position on the board shall run concurrent with the official's elected term.

Any nonelected official shall have a term of four (4) years.

If a vacancy occurs on the board, the position shall be filled in the same manner as set forth in the original appointment. A vacancy shall occur when any board member no longer meets the requirements for appointment to the board.

The board shall meet annually at a time and place designated by the board. The time, place and date of this meeting shall be published in newspapers of general circulation in Sumner and Simpson counties at least seven (7) days prior to the meeting.

The board at its annual meeting shall adopt or amend bylaws, if any, adopt an annual budget, elect officers and adopt any policies and work programs necessary for the operation of the authority and fulfillment of the purposes of the authority.

Fifty percent (50%) of the membership of the board shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of the business of the authority.

The act of fifty percent (50%) plus one (1) of all those voting shall be the act of the board for the execution of business.

The board at its annual meeting shall elect as authority officers a chair, a vice chair, and a secretary-treasurer who shall serve terms of one (1) year. The chair shall alternate between members from Tennessee and Kentucky. When a member from one (1) of the states sits as chair, no more than one (1) other member from the state can sit as vice chair or secretary-treasurer.

Any member who misses more than fifty percent (50%) of the scheduled meetings in a calendar year is removed as a member of the board.

The presiding officer of the board shall promptly notify, or cause to be notified, the appointing authority of the member who fails to satisfy the attendance requirement as prescribed in subdivision (l )(1).

Acts 1991, ch. 308, § 1; 1995, ch. 407, § 3; 2020, ch. 666, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 9, §§64-1-901 —64-1-909 (Acts 1989, ch. 382, § 1; 1990, ch. 1027, § 11), concerning the West Fork Drakes Creek dam and reservoir interstate authority, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 308, § 1, effective May 14, 1991.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (l ).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 666, § 5. April 2, 2020.

64-1-903. Powers, functions and duties of the authority.

The authority has the following general powers, functions and duties to:

Have perpetual succession in the corporate name;

Sue and be sued in the corporate name and sue and be sued in either Tennessee or Kentucky with the jurisdiction of either state's courts to be determined by where the cause of action arose;

Adopt, use and alter a corporate seal, which shall be judicially noticed;

Enter into contracts and cooperative agreements with federal, state and local governments and agencies thereof with private individuals, corporations, associations and with other organizations that the board may deem necessary or convenient in carrying out the purposes of this part;

Adopt, amend and repeal bylaws;

Employ an executive director and appoint managers, officers, employees, attorneys and agents as the board deems necessary for the transaction of its business, fix their compensation, define their duties and require bonds of such of them as the board may determine;

Receive and expend funds from any source for staffing and other administrative expenses, research, planning, coordination and activities deemed necessary to promote and carry out the purposes of the authority;

Cooperate and coordinate its activities with local, regional and state planning agencies in developing and implementing plans for the development of the projects of the authority;

Cooperate and coordinate its activities with the federal agencies having responsibility for developing natural, human and physical resources of the region;

Cooperate with local and regional financial institutions in assembling financial resources for commercial, industrial and other development;

Enter into compacts or contractual arrangements with planning agencies of both states for the purpose of preparing joint-comprehensive plans for the development and maintenance of the projects of the authority;

Acquire and hold real and personal property or interests therein as necessary to carry out the purposes of this part; and

Have and exercise other authority deemed necessary by the board to further and promote the purpose of this part.

The authority shall not exercise any broad governmental controls or police powers to regulate land use planning, zoning, subdivision regulations, building codes, or similar powers to regulate land use.

Acts 1991, ch. 308, § 1; 2020, ch. 666, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 9, §§64-1-901 —64-1-909 (Acts 1989, ch. 382, § 1; 1990, ch. 1027, § 11), concerning the West Fork Drakes Creek dam and reservoir interstate authority, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 308, § 1, effective May 14, 1991.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 666, § 5. April 2, 2020.

64-1-904. Dam and reservoir.

The authority may construct, operate and maintain a dam and reservoir on the West Fork Drakes Creek and foster recreational and economic developmental projects that would utilize these resources. The construction of this dam and reservoir shall not commence until the authority has first obtained the consent and approval of all necessary regulatory bodies.

Acts 1991, ch. 308, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 9, §§64-1-901 —64-1-909 (Acts 1989, ch. 382, § 1; 1990, ch. 1027, § 11), concerning the West Fork Drakes Creek dam and reservoir interstate authority, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 308, § 1, effective May 14, 1991.

64-1-905. Bonds and notes — Issuance — Refunding — Proceeds — Security.

The authority may issue its bonds from time to time for the purpose of paying in whole or in part the cost of acquiring lands and interests therein and of constructing facilities and improvements subject to the limitations and conditions provided in this part. Any resolution of the board authorizing the sale of bonds shall be submitted to the state funding board established by Tennessee statute and shall become effective only upon approval by that board. If the board refuses approval, it shall state in writing the reasons for the action.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this section, all bonds issued by the authority shall be payable solely out of the revenues and receipts derived from the authority's projects or of any as may be designated in the proceeding of the board under which the bonds are authorized to be issued, including debt obligations of the lessee or contracting party obtained from or in connection with the financing of a project.

Notes issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds may be retired out of the proceeds of the bonds.

The bonds may be executed and delivered by the authority at any time and from time to time, may be in the form and denominations and of the terms and maturities, may be in registered or bearer form either as the principal or interest, or both, may be payable in the installments and at the time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from the date thereof, may be payable at the place or places whether within or without the state, may bear interest at the rate or rates payable at the time or times and at the place or places and evidenced in the manner, may be executed by the officers of the authority and may contain the provisions not inconsistent herewith, as shall be provided in the proceedings of the board under which the bonds are authorized to be issued.

If deemed advisable by the board, there may be retained in the proceedings under which any bonds of the authority are authorized to be issued an option to redeem all or any part thereof as specified in the proceedings, at the price or prices and after the notice or notices and on the terms and conditions as set forth in the proceedings and as briefly recited on the face of the bonds, but nothing in this subdivision (b)(4) contained shall be construed to confer on the authority any right or option to redeem any bonds except as provided in the proceedings under which they are issued.

Any bonds of the authority may be sold at public or private sale in the manner, at the price and from time to time as determined by the board to be most advantageous, and the authority may pay all expenses, premiums and commissions that its board deems necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance thereof.

Issuance by the board of one (1) or more series of bonds for one (1) or more purposes shall not preclude it from issuing other bonds in connection with the same project or any other project, but the proceedings under which any subsequent bonds may be issued shall recognize and protect any prior pledge or mortgage made for any prior issue of bonds.

Proceeds of bonds issued by the authority may be used for the purpose of constructing, acquiring, reconstructing, improving, equipping, furnishing, bettering or extending any project or projects as authorized by this part, including the payment of interest on the bonds during construction of any project and for two (2) years after the estimated date of completion, and payment of engineering, fiscal, architectural and legal expenses incurred in connection with the project and the issuance of the bonds and the establishment of a reasonable reserve fund for the payment of principal of, and interest on, the bonds in the event of a deficiency in the revenues and receipts available for the payment.

Any bonds or notes of the authority at any time outstanding may at any time and from time to time be refunded by the authority by the issuance of its refunding bonds in the amount the board deems necessary, but not exceeding the sum of the following:

The principal amount of the obligations being refinanced;

Applicable redemption premiums thereon;

Unpaid interest on the obligations to the date of delivery or exchange of the refunding bonds. If the proceeds from the sale of the refunding bonds are to be deposited in trust, interest shall accrue on obligations from the date of delivery to the first or any subsequent available redemption date or dates selected, in its discretion, by the board or to the date or dates of maturity, whichever shall be determined by the board to be most advantageous or necessary to the authority;

A reasonable reserve for the payment of principal of, and interest on, the bonds and a renewal and replacement reserve;

If the project to be constructed from the proceeds of the obligations being refinanced has not been completed, an amount sufficient to meet the interest charges on the refunding bonds during the construction of the project and for two (2) years after the estimated date of completion, but only to the extent that interest charges have not been capitalized from the proceeds of the obligations being refinanced; and

Expenses, premiums and commissions of the authority, including bond discounts, deemed by the board to be necessary for the issuance of the refunding bonds. A determination by the board that any refinancing is advantageous or necessary to the authority, that any of the amounts provided in this subdivision (c)(6) should be included in such refinancing or that any of the obligations to be refinanced should be called for redemption on the first or any subsequent available redemption date or permitted to remain outstanding until their respective dates of maturity shall be conclusive.

Any refund may be made whether the obligations to be refunded shall have then matured or shall thereafter mature, either by the exchange of the refunding bonds for the obligations to be refunded thereby with the consent of the holders of the obligations so to be refunded or by sale of the refunding bonds and the applications of the proceeds thereof to the payment of obligations to be refunded thereby, and regardless of whether or not the obligations proposed to be refunded shall be payable on the same date or different dates or shall be due serially or otherwise.

Prior to issuance of the refunding bonds, the board shall cause notice of its intention to issue the refunding bonds, identifying the obligations proposed to be refunded and setting forth the estimated date of delivery of the refunding bonds, to be given to the holders of the refunding bonds, to be given to the holders of the outstanding obligations by publication of an appropriate notice one (1) time each in a newspaper having general circulation in the area and in a financial newspaper published in New York, New York, and having national circulation. As soon as practicable after the delivery of the refunding bonds, and whether or not any of the obligations to be refunded are to be called for redemption, the board shall cause notice of the issuance of the refunding bonds to be given in the manner provided in this subsection (e).

If any of the obligations to be refunded are to be called for redemption, the board shall cause notice of redemption to be given in the manner required by the proceedings authorizing the outstanding obligations.

The principal proceeds from the sale of any refunding bonds shall be applied only as follows:

To the immediate payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded; or

To the extent not required for the immediate payment of the obligations being refunded, the proceeds shall be deposited in trust to provide for the payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded, and to pay any expenses incurred in connection with the refunding; but provision may be made for the pledging and disposition of any surplus, including, without limitation, provision for the pledging of any surplus to the payment of the principal of and interest on any issue or series of refunding bonds. Money in any trust fund may be invested in direct obligations of the United States government, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are guaranteed by the United States government, or obligations of any agency or instrumentality of the United States government, or in certificates of deposit issued by a bank or trust company located in the state of Kentucky, if such certificates shall be secured by a pledge of any obligations having an aggregate market value, exclusive of accrued interest, equal at least to the principal amount of the certificates so secured. Nothing in this subdivision (g)(2) shall be construed as a limitation on the duration of any deposit in trust for the retirement of obligations being refunded that shall not have matured and that shall not be presently redeemable or, if presently redeemable, shall not have been called for redemption.

All bonds, refunding bonds and the interest coupons applicable thereto shall be construed to be negotiable instruments.

The principal of and interest on any bonds issued by the authority may be secured by a pledge of the revenues and receipts out of which the same shall be made payable, and may be secured by a mortgage or deed of trust covering all or any part of the projects from which the revenues or receipts so pledged may be derived, including any enlargements of and additions to any projects thereafter made or by an assignment and pledge of all or any part of the authority's interest in and rights under the leases, sales contracts or loan agreements relating to the projects, or any thereof.

The resolution under which the bonds are authorized to be issued and any mortgage or deed of trust may contain any agreements and provisions respecting the maintenance of the projects covered thereby, the fixing and collection of rents or payments with respect to any projects or portions thereof covered by the resolution, mortgage or deed of trust, the creation and maintenance of special funds from the revenues and from proceeds of the bonds, and the rights and remedies available in the event of default, as the board shall deem advisable and not in conflict with this part. Each pledge, agreement, mortgage and deed of trust made for the benefit of security of any of the bonds of the authority shall continue effective until the principal of and interest on the bonds for the benefit of which the same were made shall have been fully paid.

Acts 1991, ch. 308, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 9, §§64-1-901 —64-1-909 (Acts 1989, ch. 382, § 1; 1990, ch. 1027, § 11), concerning the West Fork Drakes Creek dam and reservoir interstate authority, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 308, § 1, effective May 14, 1991.

64-1-906. Contributions from member governmental entities — Request for appropriation.

The various counties, towns and incorporated municipalities that are members of the authority may contribute to the work of the authority any amounts of money that their respective governing bodies, acting in their sole discretion, shall approve to be paid from the general fund of the respective county or city. Governing bodies of member local governments in Kentucky may levy any tax for this purpose not in conflict with the statutes of this state.

No later than October of each year, the authority may transmit to the governors of the commonwealth of Kentucky and the state of Tennessee a request and an amount of appropriation needed during the next fiscal year for purposes of the authority, including administration, operations and capital improvements, and appropriate justification for use of the appropriation, the amount or other amount deemed appropriate by the governor to be included in the budget transmitted to the Kentucky or Tennessee general assembly.

Acts 1991, ch. 308, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 9, §§64-1-901 —64-1-909 (Acts 1989, ch. 382, § 1; 1990, ch. 1027, § 11), concerning the West Fork Drakes Creek dam and reservoir interstate authority, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 308, § 1, effective May 14, 1991.

64-1-907. Annual statement and report — Accounting system and auditing requirement.

The board shall annually formulate and issue a statement of objectives, priorities and programs that it has adopted or envisions to meet these objectives. This statement of objectives shall be included in the annual report.

The board shall report annually to the governors of the commonwealth of Kentucky and state of Tennessee and to the general assemblies. This report shall also be transmitted to the governing bodies of each county and incorporated municipality of the authority. The report shall include a statement of financial receipts and expenditures, assets and liabilities of the authority, a summary of all activities and accomplishments for the period and proposed plans for the next year.

The auditor of public accounts shall establish in cooperation with the comptroller of the treasury of Tennessee, an acceptable accounting system and an auditing requirement for the authority. Purchasing and contracting procedures adopted by the authority shall not be effective until approved by the auditor of public accounts.

Acts 1991, ch. 308, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 9, §§64-1-901 —64-1-909 (Acts 1989, ch. 382, § 1; 1990, ch. 1027, § 11), concerning the West Fork Drakes Creek dam and reservoir interstate authority, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 308, § 1, effective May 14, 1991.

64-1-908. Interagency cooperation.

All agencies and departments of state government shall extend their cooperation and lend assistance to the authority in the formulation and implementation of the purposes of this part.

Acts 1991, ch. 308, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 9, §§64-1-901 —64-1-909 (Acts 1989, ch. 382, § 1; 1990, ch. 1027, § 11), concerning the West Fork Drakes Creek dam and reservoir interstate authority, was repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 308, § 1, effective May 14, 1991.